Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1575.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:





Req. No. 3277 Page 1


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 3603, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 102, O.S.L. 2025 (68 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 3603), is amended to read as follows:


Section 3603. A. As used in the Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program


Act:


1. a. “Basic industry” means:


(1) those manufacturing activities defined or


classified in the NAICS Manual under Industry


Sector Nos. 31, 32 and 33, Industry Group No.


5111 or Industry No. 11331,


(2) those electric power generation, transmission and


distribution activities defined or classified in


the NAICS Manual under U.S. Industry Nos. 221111


through 221122, if:


(a) an establishment engaged therein qualifies


as an exempt wholesale generator as defined


by 15 U.S.C., Section 79z-5a,


(b) the exempt wholesale generator facility


consumes from sources located within the


state at least ninety percent (90%) of the


total energy used to produce the electrical


output which qualifies for the specialized


treatment provided by the Energy Policy Act


of 1992, P.L. 102-486, 106 Stat. 2776, as

Req. No. 3277 Page 2


amended, and federal regulations adopted


pursuant thereto,


(c) the exempt wholesale generator facility


sells to purchasers located outside the


state for consumption in activities located


outside the state at least ninety percent


(90%) of the total electrical energy output


which qualifies for the specialized


treatment provided by the Energy Policy Act


of 1992, P.L. 102-486, 106 Stat. 2776, as


amended, and federal regulations adopted


pursuant thereto, and


(d) the facility is constructed on or after July


1, 1996,


(3) those administrative and facilities support


service activities defined or classified in the


NAICS Manual under Industry Group Nos. 5611 and


5612, Industry Nos. 51821, 519130, 52232 and


56142 or U.S. Industry Nos. 524291 and 551114,


those other support activities for air


transportation defined or classified in the NAICS


Manual under Industry Group No. 488190, and those


support, repair, and maintenance service


activities for the wind industry defined or

Req. No. 3277 Page 3


classified in the NAICS Manual under Industry


Group No. 811310,


(4) those professional, scientific and technical


service activities defined or classified in the


NAICS Manual under U.S. Industry Nos. 541710 and


541380,


(5) distribution centers for retail or wholesale


businesses defined or classified in the NAICS


Manual under Sector No. 42, if forty percent


(40%) or more of the inventory processed through


such warehouse is shipped out-of-state,


(6) those adjustment and collection service


activities defined or classified in the NAICS


Manual under U.S. Industry No. 561440, if


seventy-five percent (75%) of the loans to be


serviced were made by out-of-state debtors,


(7) (a) those air transportation activities defined


or classified in the NAICS Manual under


Industry Group No. 4811, if the following


facilities are located in this state:


(i) the corporate headquarters of an


establishment classified therein, and


(ii) a facility or facilities at which


reservations for transportation

Req. No. 3277 Page 4


provided by such an establishment are


processed, whether such services are


performed by employees of the


establishment, by employees of a


subsidiary of or other entity


affiliated with the establishment or by


employees of an entity with whom the


establishment has contracted for the


performance of such services; provided,


this provision shall not disqualify an


establishment which uses an out-of-


state entity or employees for some


reservations services, or


(b) those air transportation activities defined


or classified in the NAICS Manual under


Industry Group No. 4811, if an establishment


classified therein has or will have within


one (1) year sales of at least seventy-five


percent (75%) of its total sales, as


determined by the Incentive Approval


Committee pursuant to the provisions of


subsection B of this section, to out-of-


state customers or buyers, to in-state


customers or buyers if the product or

Req. No. 3277 Page 5


service is resold by the purchaser to an


out-of-state customer or buyer for ultimate


use, or to the federal government,


(8) flight training services activities defined or


classified in the NAICS Manual under U.S.


Industry Group No. 611512, which for purposes of


the Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program Act shall


include new direct jobs for which gross payroll


existed on or after January 1, 2003, as


identified in the NAICS Manual,


(9) the following, if an establishment classified


therein has or will have within one (1) year


sales of at least seventy-five percent (75%) of


its total sales, as determined by the Incentive


Approval Committee pursuant to the provisions of


subsection B of this section, to out-of-state


customers or buyers, to in-state customers or


buyers if the product or service is resold by the


purchaser to an out-of-state customer or buyer


for ultimate use, or to the federal government:


(a) those transportation and warehousing


activities defined or classified in the


NAICS Manual under Industry Subsector No.


493, if not otherwise listed in this

Req. No. 3277 Page 6


paragraph, Industry Subsector Nos. 482 and


484 and Industry Group Nos. 4884 through


4889,


(b) those passenger transportation activities


defined or classified in the NAICS Manual


under Industry Nos. 561510 and 561599,


(c) those freight or cargo transportation


activities defined or classified in the


NAICS Manual under Industry No. 541614,


(d) those insurance activities defined or


classified in the NAICS Manual under


Industry Group No. 5241,


(e) those services to dwellings and other


buildings, as defined or classified in the


NAICS Manual under Industry Group No. 5617,


excluding U.S. Industry Nos. 561730, 56171,


56172, 56174 and 56179,


(f) those equipment rental and leasing


activities defined or classified in the


NAICS Manual under Industry Group No. 5324,


(g) those information technology and other


computer-related service activities defined


or classified in the NAICS Manual under



Req. No. 3277 Page 7


Industry Group Nos. 5112, 5182, 5191 and


5415,


(h) those business support service activities


defined or classified in the NAICS Manual


under U.S. Industry Nos. 561410 through


561430, excluding 56143, and Industry No.


51911,


(i) those medical and diagnostic laboratory


activities defined or classified in the


NAICS Manual under Industry Group No. 6215,


(j) those professional, scientific and technical


service activities defined or classified in


the NAICS Manual under Industry Group Nos.


5412, 5414, 5415, 5416 and 5417, Industry


Nos. 54131, 54133, 54136 and 54137, and U.S.


Industry No. 541990, if not otherwise listed


in this paragraph,


(k) those communication service activities


defined or classified in the NAICS Manual


under Industry Nos. 51741 and 51791,


(l) those refuse systems activities defined or


classified in the NAICS Manual under


Industry Group No. 5622, provided that the


establishment is primarily engaged in the

Req. No. 3277 Page 8


capture and distribution of methane gas


produced within a landfill,


(m) general wholesale distribution of groceries,


defined or classified in the NAICS Manual


under Industry Group Nos. 4244 and 4245,


(n) those activities relating to processing of


insurance claims, defined or classified in


the NAICS Manual under U.S. Industry Nos.


524210 and 524292; provided, activities


described in U.S. Industry Nos. 524210 and


524292 in the NAICS Manual other than


processing of insurance claims shall not be


included for purposes of this subdivision,


(o) those agricultural activities classified in


the NAICS Manual under U.S. Industry Nos.


112120 and 112310,


(p) those professional organization activities


classified in the NAICS Manual under U.S.


Industry No. 813920,


(q) alternative energy structure construction


classified in the NAICS Manual under U.S.


Industry No. 237130,





Req. No. 3277 Page 9


(r) solar reflective coating application


classified in the NAICS Manual under U.S.


Industry No. 238160,


(s) solar heating equipment installation


classified in the NAICS Manual under U.S.


Industry No. 238220,


(t) those wired telecommunications carriers


classified in the NAICS Manual under U.S.


Industry No. 517110, and


(u) those securities, commodity contracts and


investment activities classified in the


NAICS Manual under Industry Subsector No.


523,


(10) those activities related to extraction or


pipeline transportation of petroleum, natural gas


or refined petroleum products, defined or


classified in the NAICS Manual under Industry


Group No. 2111, 213111, 213112 or 486, subject to


the limitations provided in paragraph 3 of this


subsection and paragraph 3 of subsection B of


this section,


(11) those activities performed by the federal


civilian workforce at a facility of the Federal


Aviation Administration located in this state if

Req. No. 3277 Page 10


the Director of the Oklahoma Department of


Commerce determines or is notified that the


federal government is soliciting proposals or


otherwise inviting states to compete for


additional federal civilian employment or


expansion of federal civilian employment at such


facilities,


(12) those activities defined or classified in the


NAICS Manual under U.S. Industry No. 711211 (2007


version),


(13) those real estate or brokerage activities


classified in the NAICS Manual under U.S.


Industry No. 53120 for which at least seventy-


five percent (75%) of the establishment’s


revenues are attributed to out-of-state sales and


at least seventy-five percent (75%) of the real


estate transactions generating those revenues are


attributed to real property located outside the


State of Oklahoma, or


(14) those support activities for rail transportation


and those support activities for water


transportation defined or classified in the NAICS


Manual under U.S. Industry Nos. 4882 and 4883.



Req. No. 3277 Page 11


b. An establishment described in subparagraph a of this


paragraph shall not be considered to be engaged in a


basic industry unless it offers, or will offer within


one hundred eighty (180) days of employment, a basic


health benefits plan to the individuals it employs in


new direct jobs in this state which is determined by


the Oklahoma Department of Commerce to consist of the


following elements or elements substantially


equivalent thereto:


(1) not more than fifty percent (50%) of the premium


shall be paid by the employee,


(2) coverage for basic hospital care,


(3) coverage for physician care,


(4) coverage for mental health care,


(5) coverage for substance abuse treatment,


(6) coverage for prescription drugs, and


(7) coverage for prenatal care;


2. “Change-in-control event” means the transfer to one or more


unrelated establishments or unrelated persons, of either:


a. beneficial ownership of more than fifty percent (50%)


in value and more than fifty percent (50%) in voting


power of the outstanding equity securities of the


transferred establishment, or



Req. No. 3277 Page 12


b. more than fifty percent (50%) in value of the assets


of an establishment.


A transferor shall be treated as related to a transferee if more


than fifty percent (50%) of the voting interests of the transferor


and transferee are owned, directly or indirectly, by the other or


are owned, directly or indirectly, by the same person or persons,


unless such transferred establishment has an outstanding class of


equity securities registered under Sections 12(b) or 15(d) of the


Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, in which event the


transferor and transferee will be treated as unrelated; provided, an


establishment applying for the Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program Act as


a result of a change-in-control event is required to apply within


one hundred eighty (180) days of the change-in-control event to


qualify for consideration. An establishment entering the Oklahoma


Quality Jobs Program Act as the result of a change-in-control event


shall be required to maintain a level of new direct jobs as agreed


to in its contract with the Oklahoma Department of Commerce and to


pay new direct jobs an average annualized wage which equals or


exceeds one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the average county


wage as that percentage is determined by the Oklahoma Department of


Commerce based upon the most recent U.S. Department of Commerce data


for the county in which the new jobs are located. For purposes of


this paragraph, healthcare premiums paid by the applicant for


individuals in new direct jobs shall not be included in the

Req. No. 3277 Page 13


annualized wage. Such establishment entering the Oklahoma Quality


Jobs Program Act as the result of a change-in-control event shall be


required to retain the contracted average annualized wage and


maintain the contracted maintenance level of new direct jobs numbers


as certified by the Tax Commission. If the required average


annualized wage or the required new direct jobs numbers do not equal


or exceed such contracted level during any quarter, the quarterly


incentive payments shall not be made and shall not be resumed until


such time as such requirements are met. An establishment described


in this paragraph shall be required to repay all incentive payments


received under the Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program Act if the


establishment is determined by the Tax Commission to no longer have


business operations in the state within three (3) years from the


beginning of the calendar quarter for which the first incentive


payment claim is filed;


3. “New direct job”:


a. means full-time-equivalent employment in this state in


an establishment which has qualified to receive an


incentive payment pursuant to the provisions of the


Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program Act which employment did


not exist in this state prior to the date of approval


by the Department of the application of the


establishment pursuant to the provisions of Section


3604 of this title and with respect to an

Req. No. 3277 Page 14


establishment qualifying for incentive payments


pursuant to division (12) of subparagraph a of


paragraph 1 of this subsection shall not include


compensation paid to an employee or independent


contractor for an athletic contest conducted in the


state if the compensation is paid by an entity that


does not have its principal place of business in the


state or that does not own real or personal property


having a market value of at least One Million Dollars


($1,000,000.00) located in the state, and the


employees or independent contractors of such entity


are compensated to compete against the employees or


independent contractors of an establishment that


qualifies for incentive payments pursuant to division


(12) of subparagraph a of paragraph 1 of this


subsection and which is organized under Oklahoma law


or that is lawfully registered to do business in the


state and which does have its principal place of


business located in the state and owns real or


personal property having a market value of at least


One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) located in the


state; provided, that if an application of an


establishment is approved by the Oklahoma Department


of Commerce after a change-in-control event and the

Req. No. 3277 Page 15


Director of the Oklahoma Department of Commerce


determines that the jobs located at such establishment


are likely to leave the state, “new direct job” shall


include employment that existed in this state prior to


the date of application which is retained in this


state by the new establishment following a change in


control event, if such job otherwise qualifies as a


new direct job, and


b. shall include full-time-equivalent employment in this


state of employees who are employed by an employment


agency or similar entity other than the establishment


which has qualified to receive an incentive payment


and who are leased or otherwise provided under


contract to the qualified establishment, if such job


did not exist in this state prior to the date of


approval by the Department of the application of the


establishment or the job otherwise qualifies as a new


direct job following a change-in-control event. The


leasing of employees by the establishment or employees


provided under contract with an establishment shall


constitute an employer-employee relationship between


those employees and the establishment. A job shall be


deemed to exist in this state prior to approval of an


application if the activities and functions for which

Req. No. 3277 Page 16


the particular job exists have been ongoing at any


time within six (6) months prior to such approval.


With respect to establishments defined in division


(10) of subparagraph a of paragraph 1 of this


subsection, new direct jobs shall be limited to those


jobs directly comprising the corporate headquarters of


or directly relating to manufacturing, maintenance,


administrative, financial, engineering, surveying,


geological or geophysical services performed by the


establishment. Under no circumstances shall


employment relating to field services be considered


new direct jobs;


4. “Estimated direct state benefits” means the tax revenues


projected by the Department to accrue to the state as a result of


new direct jobs;


5. “Estimated direct state costs” means the costs projected by


the Department to accrue to the state as a result of new direct


jobs. Such costs shall include, but not be limited to:


a. the costs of education of new state resident children,


b. the costs of public health, public safety and


transportation services to be provided to new state


residents,


c. the costs of other state services to be provided to


new state residents, and

Req. No. 3277 Page 17


d. the costs of other state services;


6. “Estimated net direct state benefits” means the estimated


direct state benefits less the estimated direct state costs;


7. “Net benefit rate” means the estimated net direct state


benefits computed as a percentage of gross payroll; provided:


a. except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, the


net benefit rate may be variable and shall not exceed


five percent (5%) the highest rate of income tax


imposed upon the Oklahoma taxable income of


individuals pursuant to subsection D of Section 2355


of this title. Any change in the highest rate of


individual income tax imposed pursuant to the


provisions of Section 2355 of this title shall be


applicable to the computation of incentive payments to


an establishment and shall be effective for purposes


of incentive payments based on payroll paid by an


establishment on or after January 1 of any applicable


year for which the net benefit rate is modified as


required by this subparagraph, and


b. the net benefit rate shall not exceed six percent (6%)


in connection with an establishment which is owned and


operated by an entity which has been awarded a United


States Department of Defense contract for which:



Req. No. 3277 Page 18


(1) bids were solicited and accepted by the United


States Department of Defense from facilities


located outside this state,


(2) the term is or is renewable for not less than


twenty (20) years, and


(3) the average annual salary, excluding benefits


which are not subject to Oklahoma income taxes,


for new direct jobs created as a direct result of


the awarding of the contract is projected by the


Oklahoma Department of Commerce to equal or


exceed Forty Thousand Dollars ($40,000.00) within


three (3) years of the date of the first


incentive payment,


c. except as otherwise provided in subparagraph d of this


paragraph, in no event shall incentive payments,


cumulatively, exceed the estimated net direct state


benefits,


d. the net benefit rate shall be five percent (5%) for an


establishment locating:


(1) in an opportunity zone located in a high-


employment county, as such terms are defined in


subsection G of Section 3604 of this title, or


(2) in a county in which:



Req. No. 3277 Page 19


(a) the per capita personal income, as


determined by the Department, is eighty-five


percent (85%) or less of the statewide


average per capita personal income,


(b) the population has decreased over the


previous ten (10) years, as determined by


the Oklahoma Department of Commerce based on


the most recent U.S. Department of Commerce


data, or


(c) the unemployment rate exceeds the lesser of


five percent (5%) or two percentage points


above the state average unemployment rate as


certified by the Oklahoma Employment


Security Commission,


e. the net benefit rate shall not exceed six percent (6%)


in connection with an establishment which:


(1) is, as of the date of application, receiving


incentive payments pursuant to the Oklahoma


Quality Jobs Program Act and has been receiving


such payments for at least one (1) year prior to


the date of application, and


(2) expands its operations in this state by creating


additional new direct jobs which pay average


annualized wages which equal or exceed one

Req. No. 3277 Page 20


hundred fifty percent (150%) of the average


annualized wages of new direct jobs on which


incentive payments were received during the


preceding calendar year,


f. with respect to an establishment defined or classified


in the NAICS Manual under U.S. Industry No. 711211


(2007 version) or any establishment defined or


classified in the NAICS Manual as a U.S. Industry


Number which is not included within the definition of


“basic industry” as such term is defined in this


section on April 17, 2008, the net benefit rate shall


not exceed the highest rate of income tax imposed upon


the Oklahoma taxable income of individuals pursuant to


subparagraph (g) or subparagraph (h), as applicable,


of paragraph 1 and paragraph 2 of subsection B of


Section 2355 of this title. Any change in such


highest rate of individual income tax imposed pursuant


to the provisions of Section 2355 of this title shall


be applicable to the computation of incentive payments


to an establishment as described by this subparagraph


and shall be effective for purposes of incentive


payments based on payroll paid by such establishment


on or after January 1 of any applicable year for which



Req. No. 3277 Page 21


the net benefit rate is modified as required by this


subparagraph, and


g. the net benefit rate shall not exceed six percent (6%)


in connection with an establishment which employs


United States military veterans in at least ten


percent (10%) of its gross payroll. The net benefit


rate for an establishment which employs United States


military veterans in at least ten percent (10%) of its


payroll shall not be lower than five percent (5%).


Incentive payments made pursuant to the provisions of this


subparagraph shall be based upon payroll associated with such new


direct jobs. For purposes of this subparagraph, the amount of


health insurance premiums or other benefits paid by the


establishment shall not be included for purposes of computation of


the average annualized wage;


8. “Gross payroll” means wages, as defined in Section 2385.1 of


this title for new direct jobs;


9. a. “Establishment” means any business or governmental


entity, no matter what legal form, including, but not


limited to, a sole proprietorship; partnership;


limited liability company; corporation or combination


of corporations which have a central parent


corporation which makes corporate management decisions


such as those involving consolidation, acquisition,

Req. No. 3277 Page 22


merger or expansion; federal agency; political


subdivision of the State of Oklahoma; or trust


authority; provided, distinct, identifiable subunits


of such entities may be determined to be an


establishment, for all purposes of the Oklahoma


Quality Jobs Program Act, by the Department subject to


the following conditions:


(1) within three (3) years of the first complete


calendar quarter following the start date, the


entity must have a minimum payroll of Two Million


Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($2,500,000.00) and


the subunit must also have or will have a minimum


payroll of Two Million Five Hundred Thousand


Dollars ($2,500,000.00),


(2) the subunit is engaged in an activity or service


or produces a product which is demonstratively


independent and separate from the entity’s other


activities, services or products and could be


conducted or produced in the absence of any other


activity, service or production of the entity,


(3) has an accounting system capable of tracking or


facilitating an audit of the subunit’s payroll,


expenses, revenue and production. Limited


interunit overlap of administrative and

Req. No. 3277 Page 23


purchasing functions shall not disqualify a


subunit from consideration as an establishment by


the Department,


(4) the entity has not previously had a subunit


determined to be an establishment pursuant to


this section; provided, the restriction set forth


in this division shall not apply to subunits


which qualify pursuant to the provisions of


subparagraph b of paragraph 7 of this subsection,


and


(5) it is determined by the Department that the


entity will have a probable net gain in total


employment within the incentive period.


b. The Department may promulgate rules to further limit


the circumstances under which a subunit may be


considered an establishment. The Department shall


promulgate rules to determine whether a subunit of an


entity achieves a net gain in total employment. The


Department shall establish criteria for determining


the period of time within which such gain must be


demonstrated and a method for determining net gain in


total employment;


10. “NAICS Manual” means any manual, book or other publication


containing the North American Industry Classification System, United

Req. No. 3277 Page 24


States, 1997, promulgated by the Office of Management and Budget of


the United States of America, or the latest revised edition;


11. “Qualified federal contract” means a contract between an


agency or instrumentality of the United States government, including


but not limited to the Department of Defense or any branch of the


United States Armed Forces, but exclusive of any contract performed


for the Federal Emergency Management Agency as a direct result of a


natural disaster declared by the Governor or the President of the


United States with respect to damage to property located in Oklahoma


or loss of life or personal injury to persons in Oklahoma, and a


lawfully recognized business entity, whether or not the business


entity is organized under the laws of the State of Oklahoma or


whether or not the principal place of business of the business


entity is located within the State of Oklahoma, for the performance


of services, including but not limited to testing, research,


development, consulting or other services in a basic industry, if


the contract involves the performance of such services performed on


or after July 1, 2009, by the employees of the business entity


within the State of Oklahoma or if the contract involves the


performance of such services performed on or after July 1, 2009, by


employees of a lawfully recognized business entity that is a


subcontractor of the business entity with which the prime contract


has been formed. A qualified federal contract described in this


paragraph shall not qualify unless both the qualified federal

Req. No. 3277 Page 25


contractor and any subcontractors originally involved in the work or


added subsequently during the period of performance verify to the


qualified federal contractor verifier that it offers, or will offer


within one hundred eighty (180) days of employment of its respective


employees, a basic health benefits plan as described in subparagraph


b of paragraph 1 of this subsection to individuals who perform


qualified labor hours in this state;


12. “Qualified federal contractor verifier” means a nonprofit


entity organized under the laws of the State of Oklahoma, having an


affiliation with a comprehensive university which is part of The


Oklahoma State System of Higher Education, and having the following


characteristics:


a. established multiyear classified and unclassified


indefinite-delivery/indefinite-quantity federal


contract vehicles in excess of Fifty Million Dollars


($50,000,000.00),


b. current capability to sponsor and maintain personnel


security clearances and authorized by the federal


government to handle and perform classified work up to


the Top Secret Sensitive Compartmented Information


levels,


c. at least one on-site federally certified Sensitive


Compartmented Information Facility,



Req. No. 3277 Page 26


d. on-site secure mass data storage complex with the


capability of isolating, segregating and protecting


corporate proprietary and classified information,


e. trusted agent status by maintaining no ownership of,


vested interest in, nor royalty production from any


intellectual property,


f. at least one hundred thousand (100,000) square feet of


configurable laboratory and support space,


g. the direct access to restricted air space through a


formalized memorandum of agreement with the Department


of Defense,


h. at least five thousand (5,000) acres available for


outdoor testing and training facilities, and


i. the ability to house state-of-the-art surety


facilities, including chemical, biological,


radiological, explosives, electronics, and unmanned


systems laboratories and ranges;


13. “SIC Manual” means the 1987 revision to the Standard


Industrial Classification Manual, promulgated by the Office of


Management and Budget of the United States of America;


14. “Start date” means the date on which an establishment may


begin accruing benefits for the creation of new direct jobs, which


date shall be determined by the Department;



Req. No. 3277 Page 27


15. “Effective date” means the date of approval of a contract


under which incentive payments will be made pursuant to the Oklahoma


Quality Jobs Program Act, which shall be the date the signed and


accepted incentive contract is received by the Department; provided,


an approved project may have a start date which is different from


the effective date;


16. “Total qualified labor hours” means the reimbursed payment


amount for hours of work performed by the State of Oklahoma


workforce of a qualified federal contractor or the State of Oklahoma


workforce of a subcontractor of a qualified federal contractor and


which are required for the full performance of a qualified federal


contract;


17. “Qualified labor rate” means the fully reimbursed labor


rate paid through a qualified federal contract for qualified labor


hours to the qualified federal contractor or subcontractor;


18. “Qualified federal contractor” means a business entity:


a. maintaining a prime contract with the federal


government as defined in paragraph 11 of this


subsection,


b. providing notice of intent to apply to the Department


within one hundred eighty (180) days of July 1, 2010,


or one hundred eighty (180) days of the date of the


award of a qualified federal contract or award of a



Req. No. 3277 Page 28


new qualified subcontract under an existing qualified


federal contract, and


c. adding substantively to the contract by performing at


least eight percent (8%) of the total labor whether


qualified and nonqualified labor as determined by the


federal contractor verifier on a direct contract or


individual task order or delivery order on an


indefinite-delivery/indefinite-quantity or other


blanket contract vehicle.


Should a prime contractor provide notice to the Department of


its intent not to apply for incentive for a qualified federal


contract or fails to qualify under the criteria above,


subcontractors in order of tier ranking as determined by the federal


contract verifier may assume the role of the prime and apply to


become a qualified federal contractor provided the entity meets the


same criteria above with the exception that notice of intent to


apply with the Department must be provided within sixty (60) days of


the prime’s disqualification or one hundred eighty (180) days of the


award of its subcontract, whichever is later; and


19. “Proxy establishment” means a public trust which:


a. is organized and existing under Section 176 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes for the benefit of a


geographic area which includes a city or county or


some combination thereof, and

Req. No. 3277 Page 29


b. benefits a geographic area where new direct jobs which


meet the requirements of the Oklahoma Quality Jobs


Program Act are created by an establishment, other


than the proxy establishment, which is a branch of the


Armed Forces of the United States.


A proxy establishment may be determined to be an establishment


for all purposes of the Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program Act by the


Department and incentive payments may be made to such proxy


establishment for new direct jobs otherwise qualified pursuant to


the Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program Act. The Department may


promulgate rules to further specify the circumstances under which a


proxy establishment may be considered an establishment for the


purposes of making application for incentive payments pursuant to


the Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program Act. Provided however, that with


respect to any data on qualifying direct new jobs from a branch of


the Armed Forces of the United States, such rules shall only require


a proxy establishment to provide such data as would otherwise be


publicly releasable by the branch of the Armed Forces of the United


States.


B. The Incentive Approval Committee is hereby created and shall


consist of the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise


Services, the Director of the Department and one member of the


Oklahoma Tax Commission appointed by the Tax Commission, or a


designee from each agency approved by such member. It shall be the

Req. No. 3277 Page 30


duty of the Committee to determine the eligibility of all applicants


for the Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program Act, subject to the applicable


requirements.


C. For an establishment defined as a “basic industry” pursuant


to division (4) of subparagraph a of paragraph 1 of subsection A of


this section, the Incentive Approval Committee shall consist of the


members provided by subsection B of this section and the Executive


Director of the Oklahoma Center for the Advancement of Science and


Technology, or a designee from the Center appointed by the Executive


Director.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 3604, as


last amended by Section 157, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (68 O.S. Supp.


2025, Section 3604), is amended to read as follows:


Section 3604. A. Except as otherwise provided in subsection I


or subsection L of this section, an establishment which meets the


qualifications specified in the Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program Act


may receive quarterly incentive payments for a ten-year period from


the Oklahoma Tax Commission pursuant to the provisions of the


Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program Act; provided, such an establishment


defined or classified in the NAICS North American Industry


Classification System (NAICS) Manual under U.S. Industry No. 711211


(2007 version) may receive quarterly incentive payments for a


thirty-year period. The amount of such payments shall be equal to


the net benefit rate multiplied by the actual gross payroll of new

Req. No. 3277 Page 31


direct jobs for a calendar quarter as verified by the Oklahoma


Employment Security Commission. For an establishment defined or


classified in the NAICS Manual under U.S. Industry No. 711211 (2007


version) that entered into a contract pursuant to the Oklahoma


Quality Jobs Program Act with the Oklahoma Department of Commerce


before the effective date of this act November 1, 2023:


1. The contract shall be extended from fifteen (15) years to


thirty (30) years; and


2. The extension shall not include additional money awarded but


shall allow for payments to continue for the thirty-year period, or


until the net benefit for the new direct jobs for the original


contract has been fully paid out as calculated based upon the


original application.


B. In order to receive incentive payments, an establishment


shall apply to the Oklahoma Department of Commerce. The application


shall be on a form prescribed by the Department and shall contain


such information as may be required by the Department to determine


if the applicant is qualified. An establishment may apply for an


effective date for a project, which shall not be more than twenty-


four (24) months from the date the application is submitted to the


Department.


C. Except as otherwise provided by subsection D or E of this


section, in order to qualify to receive such payments, the


establishment applying shall be required to:

Req. No. 3277 Page 32


1. Be engaged in a basic industry;


2. Have an annual gross payroll for new direct jobs projected


by the Department to equal or exceed Two Million Five Hundred


Thousand Dollars ($2,500,000.00) within three (3) years of the first


complete calendar quarter following the start date; and


3. Have a number of full-time-equivalent employees subject to


the tax imposed by Section 2355 of this title and working an annual


average of thirty (30) or more hours per week in new direct jobs


located in this state equal to or in excess of eighty percent (80%)


of the total number of new direct jobs.


D. In order to qualify to receive incentive payments as


authorized by the Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program Act, an


establishment engaged in an activity described under:


1. Industry Group Nos. 3111 through 3119 of the NAICS Manual


shall be required to:


a. have an annual gross payroll for new direct jobs


projected by the Department to equal or exceed One


Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($1,500,000.00)


within three (3) years of the first complete calendar


quarter following the start date and make, or which


will make within one (1) year, at least seventy-five


percent (75%) of its total sales, as determined by the


Incentive Approval Committee pursuant to the


provisions of subsection B of Section 3603 of this

Req. No. 3277 Page 33


title, to out-of-state customers or buyers, to in-


state customers or buyers if the product or service is


resold by the purchaser to an out-of-state customer or


buyer for ultimate use, or to the federal government,


unless the annual gross payroll equals or exceeds Two


Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($2,500,000.00)


in which case the requirements for purchase of output


provided by this subparagraph shall not apply, and


b. have a number of full-time-equivalent employees


working an average of thirty (30) or more hours per


week in new direct jobs equal to or in excess of


eighty percent (80%) of the total number of new direct


jobs; and


2. Division (4) of subparagraph a of paragraph 1 of subsection


A of Section 3603 of this title, shall be required to:


a. have an annual gross payroll for new direct jobs


projected by the Department to equal or exceed One


Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($1,500,000.00)


within three (3) years of the first complete calendar


quarter following the start date, and


b. have a number of full-time-equivalent employees


working an average of thirty (30) or more hours per


week in new direct jobs equal to or in excess of



Req. No. 3277 Page 34


eighty percent (80%) of the total number of new direct


jobs.


E. 1. An establishment which locates its principal business


activity within a site consisting of at least ten (10) acres which:


a. is a federal Superfund removal site,


b. is listed on the National Priorities List established


under Section 9605 of Title 42 of the United States


Code,


c. has been formally deferred to the state in lieu of


listing on the National Priorities List, or


d. has been determined by the Department of Environmental


Quality to be contaminated by any substance regulated


by a federal or state statute governing environmental


conditions for real property pursuant to an order of


the Department of Environmental Quality,


shall qualify for incentive payments irrespective of its actual


gross payroll or the number of full-time-equivalent employees


engaged in new direct jobs.


2. In order to qualify for the incentive payments pursuant to


this subsection, the establishment shall conduct the activity


resulting in at least fifty percent (50%) of its Oklahoma taxable


income or adjusted gross income, as determined under Section 2358 of


this title, whether from the sale of products or services or both


products and services, at the physical location which has been

Req. No. 3277 Page 35


determined not to comply with the federal or state statutes


described in this subsection with respect to environmental


conditions for real property. The establishment shall be subject to


all other requirements of the Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program Act


other than the exemptions provided by this subsection.


3. In order to qualify for the incentive payments pursuant to


this subsection, the entity shall obtain from the Department of


Environmental Quality a letter of concurrence that:


a. the site designated by the entity does meet one or


more of the requirements listed in paragraph 1 of this


subsection, and


b. the site is being or has been remediated to a level


which is consistent with the intended use of the


property.


In making its determination, the Department of Environmental


Quality may rely on existing data and information available to it,


but may also require the applying entity to provide additional data


and information, as necessary.


4. If authorized by the Department of Environmental Quality


pursuant to paragraph 3 of this subsection, the entity may utilize a


remediated portion of the property for its intended purpose prior to


remediation of the remainder of the site, and shall qualify for


incentive payments based on employment associated with the portion


of the site.

Req. No. 3277 Page 36


F. Except as otherwise provided by subsection G of this


section, for applications submitted on and after June 4, 2003, in


order to qualify to receive incentive payments as authorized by the


Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program Act, in addition to other


qualifications specified herein, an establishment shall be required


to pay new direct jobs an average annualized wage which equals or


exceeds:


1. One hundred ten percent (110%) of the average county wage as


determined by the Oklahoma Department of Commerce based on the most


recent U.S. United States Department of Commerce data for the county


in which the new direct jobs are located. For purposes of this


paragraph, health care premiums paid by the applicant for


individuals in new direct jobs shall be included in the annualized


wage; or


2. One hundred percent (100%) of the average county wage as


that percentage is determined by the Oklahoma Department of Commerce


based upon the most recent U.S. United States Department of Commerce


data for the county in which the new jobs are located. For purposes


of this paragraph, health care premiums paid by the applicant for


individuals in new direct jobs shall not be included in the


annualized wage.


Provided, for applications submitted before January 1, 2027, no


average wage requirement shall exceed Twenty-five Thousand Dollars


($25,000.00), in any county. This maximum wage threshold shall be

Req. No. 3277 Page 37


indexed and modified from time to time based on the latest Consumer


Price Index year-to-date percent change release as of the date of


the annual average county wage data release from the Bureau of


Economic Analysis of the U.S. United States Department of Commerce.


G. 1. As used in this subsection, “opportunity zone” means one


or more census tracts in which, according to the most recent Federal


Decennial Census, at least thirty percent (30%) of the residents


have annual gross household incomes from all sources below the


poverty guidelines established by the U.S. United States Department


of Health and Human Services. An establishment which is otherwise


qualified to receive incentive payments and which locates its


principal business activity in an opportunity zone shall not be


subject to the requirements of subsection F of this section.


2. As used in this subsection:


a. “negative economic event” means:


(1) a man-made disaster or natural disaster as


defined in Section 683.3 of Title 63 of the


Oklahoma Statutes, resulting in the loss of a


significant number of jobs within a particular


county of this state, or


(2) an economic circumstance in which a significant


number of jobs within a particular county of this


state have been lost due to an establishment


changing its structure, consolidating with

Req. No. 3277 Page 38


another establishment, closing or moving all or


part of its operations out of this state, and


b. “significant number of jobs” means Local Area


Unemployment Statistics (LAUS) data, as determined by


the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics, for a


county which are equal to or in excess of five percent


(5%) of the total amount of Local Area Unemployment


Statistics (LAUS) data for that county for the


calendar year, or most recent twelve-month period in


which employment is measured, preceding the event.


An establishment which is otherwise qualified to receive


incentive payments and which locates in a county in which a negative


economic event has occurred within the eighteen-month period


preceding the start date shall not be subject to the requirements of


subsection F of this section; provided, an establishment shall not


be eligible to receive incentive payments based upon a negative


economic event with respect to jobs that are transferred from one


county of this state to another.


H. The Oklahoma Department of Commerce shall determine if the


applicant is qualified to receive incentive payments.


I. If the applicant is determined to be qualified by the


Department and is not subject to the provisions of subparagraph d of


paragraph 7 of subsection A of Section 3603 of this title, the


Department shall conduct a cost/benefit cost-benefit analysis to

Req. No. 3277 Page 39


determine the estimated net direct state benefits and the net


benefit rate applicable for a ten-year period beginning with the


first complete calendar quarter following the start date and to


estimate the amount of gross payroll for a ten-year period beginning


with the first complete calendar quarter following the start date or


for a thirty-year period for an establishment defined or classified


in the NAICS Manual under U.S. Industry No. 711211 (2007 version).


In conducting such cost/benefit cost-benefit analysis, the


Department shall consider quantitative factors, such as the


anticipated level of new tax revenues to the state along with the


added cost to the state of providing services, and such other


criteria as deemed appropriate by the Department. In no event shall


incentive payments, cumulatively, exceed the estimated net direct


state benefits, except for applicants subject to the provisions of


subparagraph d of paragraph 7 of subsection A of Section 3603 of


this title.


J. Upon approval of such an application, the Department shall


notify the Tax Commission and shall provide it with a copy of the


contract and the results of the cost/benefit cost-benefit analysis.


The Tax Commission may require the qualified establishment to submit


such additional information as may be necessary to administer the


provisions of the Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program Act. The approved


establishment shall file quarterly claims with the Tax Commission


and shall continue to file such quarterly claims during the ten-year

Req. No. 3277 Page 40


incentive period to show its continued eligibility for incentive


payments, as provided in Section 3606 of this title, or until it is


no longer qualified to receive incentive payments. The


establishment may be audited by the Tax Commission to verify such


eligibility. Once the establishment is approved, an agreement shall


be deemed to exist between the establishment and the State of


Oklahoma, requiring the continued incentive payment to be made as


long as the establishment retains its eligibility as defined in and


established pursuant to this section and Sections 3603 and 3606 of


this title and within the limitations contained in the Oklahoma


Quality Jobs Program Act, which existed at the time of such


approval. An establishment described in this subsection shall be


required to repay all incentive payments received under the Oklahoma


Quality Jobs Program Act if the establishment is determined by the


Oklahoma Tax Commission to no longer have business operations in the


state within three (3) years from the beginning of the calendar


quarter for which the first incentive payment claim is filed.


K. A municipality with a population of less than one hundred


thousand (100,000) persons in which an establishment eligible to


receive quarterly incentive payments pursuant to the provisions of


this section is located may file a claim with the Tax Commission for


up to twenty-five percent (25%) of the amount of such payment. The


amount of such claim shall not exceed amounts paid by the


municipality for direct costs of municipal infrastructure

Req. No. 3277 Page 41


improvements to provide water and sewer service to the


establishment. Such claim shall not be approved by the Tax


Commission unless the municipality and the establishment have


entered into a written agreement for such claims to be filed by the


municipality prior to submission of the application of the


establishment pursuant to the provisions of this section. If such


claim is approved, the amount of the payment to the establishment


made pursuant to the provisions of Section 3606 of this title shall


be reduced by the amount of the approved claim by the municipality


and the Tax Commission shall issue a warrant to the municipality in


the amount of the approved claim in the same manner as warrants are


issued to qualifying establishments.


L. For any contract executed by an establishment on or after


August 2, 2018, five percent (5%) of the quarterly incentive payment


amount shall be transferred by the Oklahoma Tax Commission to the


Oklahoma Quick Action Closing Fund.


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 3604.1, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 3604.1. A. A qualified federal contractor may receive


quarterly incentive payments for renewable ten-year periods from the


Oklahoma Tax Commission pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma


Quality Jobs Program Act and the provisions of this section.


B. The amount of such payments shall be equal to a net benefit


rate of not less than twenty-five hundredths one-hundredths of one

Req. No. 3277 Page 42


percent (0.25%), but not greater than two percent (2%), multiplied


by the total qualified labor hours worked by employees of the


federal contractor or employees of a qualified federal


subcontractor, or both, pursuant to a qualified federal contract for


a calendar quarter as verified by the Oklahoma Employment Security


Commission and certified by a qualified federal contractor verifier.


The net benefit rate for a qualified federal contractor shall be


scaled to annual subcontracting goals that account for both total


qualified subcontract labor hours and the ratio of qualified


subcontract labor hours to total qualified labor hours. Unless


limited by the cost/benefit cost-benefit analysis, the net benefit


rate shall:


1. Not exceed twenty-five hundredths one-hundredths of one


percent (0.25%) when annual qualified subcontract labor hours are


less than Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($200,000.00) or when annual


qualified subcontract labor is less than one percent (1%) of the


annual total qualified labor hours claimed;


2. Not be less than five-tenths of one percent (0.5%) when


subcontract goals are met with a minimum of Two Hundred Thousand


Dollars ($200,000.00) of annual total qualified subcontractor labor


hours and these hours are a minimum of one percent (1%) of the


annual total qualified hours claimed;


3. Not be less than one percent (1%) when subcontract goals are


met with a minimum of One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) of annual

Req. No. 3277 Page 43


total qualified subcontractor labor hours and when these hours


represent a minimum of five percent (5%) of the annual total


qualified hours claimed;


4. Not be less than one and five-tenths percent (1.5%) when


subcontract goals are met with a minimum of Two Million Dollars


($2,000,000.00) of annual total qualified subcontractor labor hours


and these hours are a minimum of ten percent (10%) of the annual


total qualified hours claimed; and


5. Not be less than two percent (2.0%) when subcontract goals


are met with a minimum of Four Million Dollars ($4,000,000.00) of


annual total qualified subcontractor labor hours and these hours are


a minimum of twenty percent (20%) of the annual total qualified


hours claimed.


C. In order to receive incentive payments, a qualified federal


contractor shall apply to the Oklahoma Department of Commerce within


one hundred eighty (180) days following the date of the award of a


qualified federal contract or award of a new qualified subcontract


under an existing qualified federal contract. The application shall


be on a form prescribed by the Department and shall contain such


information as may be required by the Department to determine if the


applicant is qualified. Once qualified by the Department, the


applicant shall submit qualified federal contracts to the federal


contract verifier. The federal contract verifier shall establish


with the applicant an information system(s) or contract(s) as may be

Req. No. 3277 Page 44


required to certify the total qualified labor hours, qualified labor


rates, and reimbursement through the qualified federal contract. A


qualified federal contractor may apply for an effective date for a


project, which shall not be more than twenty-four (24) months from


the date the application is submitted to the Department. No state


agency shall be required to make any payment to a qualified federal


contract verifier for any information needed by the agency to


perform any duty imposed upon it pursuant to the provisions of


Section 3601 et seq. of this title. All costs for the federal


contract verifier shall be reimbursed through value-added services


on the qualified federal contract or other mechanisms agreed to by


the federal contractor verifier and the federal contract performers.


D. In order to qualify to receive incentive payments as


authorized by the Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program Act, in addition to


other qualifications specified herein, a qualified federal


contractor shall be required to pay direct jobs an average


annualized wage which equals or exceeds:


1. One hundred ten percent (110%) of the average county wage as


determined by the Oklahoma Department of Commerce based on the most


recent U.S. United States Department of Commerce data for the county


in which the new direct jobs are located. For purposes of this


paragraph, health care premiums paid by the applicant for


individuals in new direct jobs shall be included in the annualized


wage; or

Req. No. 3277 Page 45


2. One hundred percent (100%) of the average county wage as


that percentage is determined by the Oklahoma Department of Commerce


based upon the most recent U.S. United States Department of Commerce


data for the county in which the new jobs are located. For purposes


of this paragraph, health care premiums paid by the applicant for


individuals in new direct jobs shall not be included in the


annualized wage.


Provided, for applications submitted before January 1, 2027, no


average wage requirement shall exceed Twenty-nine Thousand Four


Hundred Nine Dollars ($29,409.00), in any county. This maximum wage


threshold shall be indexed and modified from time to time based on


the latest Consumer Price Index year-to-date percent change release


as of the date of the annual average county wage data release from


the Bureau of Economic Analysis of the U.S. United States Department


of Commerce.


3. For qualified subcontractor work, the qualified federal


contractor shall have a minimum average qualified labor rate


requirement paid to the subcontractor of Thirty-one Dollars ($31.00)


per hour, in any county. This maximum wage threshold shall be


indexed and modified from time to time based on the latest Consumer


Price Index year-to-date percent change release as of the date of


the annual average county wage data release from the Bureau of


Economic Analysis of the U.S. United States Department of Commerce.



Req. No. 3277 Page 46


E. The Oklahoma Department of Commerce shall determine if the


applicant is qualified to receive incentive payments using


information supplied to the Department by the qualified federal


contractor verifier. The NAICS North American Industry


Classification System (NAICS) code or codes under which the federal


government awarded the qualified federal contract shall be used to


determine the basic industry for a qualified federal contractor.


For federal contracts awarded under NAICS codes not within the


definition of basic industry pursuant to paragraph 1 of subsection A


of Section 3603 of this title, the Oklahoma Department of Commerce,


with the federal contract verifier, may evaluate and utilize


individual statement of work items that would qualify within a basic


industry definition.


F. If the applicant is determined to be qualified by the


Department, the Department shall conduct a cost/benefit cost-benefit


analysis to determine the estimated net direct state benefits and


the net benefit rate, as provided by subsection B of this section,


applicable for a ten-year period beginning with the first complete


calendar quarter following the start date and to estimate the amount


of gross payroll and total qualified labor hours for a ten-year


period beginning with the first complete calendar quarter following


the start date. In conducting such cost/benefit cost-benefit


analysis, the Department shall consider quantitative factors, such


as the anticipated level of new tax revenues to the state along with

Req. No. 3277 Page 47


the added cost to the state of providing services, and such other


criteria as deemed appropriate by the Department. In no event shall


incentive payments, cumulatively, exceed the estimated net direct


state benefits. Using this net cost/benefit cost-benefit analysis


model, the Department may establish the renewable ten-year contract


with a qualified federal contractor at the entity level to encompass


any current or future qualified federal contracts that meet the


cost/benefit cost-benefit analysis metrics as determined by the


federal contractor verifier and confirmed by the Department.


G. Upon approval of such an application, the Department shall


notify the Tax Commission and shall provide it with a copy of the


contract that has been cosigned by the federal contractor verifier


and the results of the cost/benefit cost-benefit analysis. The Tax


Commission may require the qualified federal contractor, federal


contract verifier, and qualified subcontractors to submit such


additional information as may be necessary to administer the


provisions of the Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program Act. The approved


qualified federal contractor shall file quarterly claims with the


Tax Commission and shall continue to file such quarterly claims


during the ten-year incentive period to show its continued


eligibility for incentive payments, as provided in Section 3606 of


this title, or until it is no longer qualified to receive incentive


payments. The qualified federal contractor may be audited by the


Tax Commission to verify such eligibility. Once the qualified

Req. No. 3277 Page 48


federal contractor is approved, an agreement shall be deemed to


exist between the qualified federal contractor and the State of


Oklahoma this state, requiring the continued incentive payment to be


made as long as the qualified federal contractor retains its


eligibility as defined in and established pursuant to this section


and Sections 3603 and 3606 of this title and within the limitations


contained in the Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program Act, which existed at


the time of such approval.


H. For qualified federal contracts with periods of performance


exceeding two (2) years, if the actual annual verified gross


qualified labor hours for four (4) consecutive calendar quarters


does do not equal or exceed Two Million Five Hundred Thousand


Dollars ($2,500,000.00) within three (3) years of the start date, or


does do not equal or exceed actual annual gross qualified labor


hours of Two Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($2,500,000.00)


at any other time during the ten-year period after the start date,


the incentive payments shall not be made and shall not be resumed


until such time as the actual annual qualified labor hours exceed


Two Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($2,500,000.00).


I. If the average annualized wage or minimum average qualified


labor rate required by subsection H of this section is not met


during any calendar quarter, the incentive payments shall not be


made and shall not be resumed until such time as such requirements


are met.

Req. No. 3277 Page 49


J. Before approving a quarterly incentive payment for a


qualified federal contract, the federal contract verifier must first


determine through the Department that neither the qualified federal


contractor nor the subcontractor are receiving incentive payments


under the Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program Act, the Saving Quality Jobs


Act, the 21st Century Quality Jobs Incentive Act or the Former


Military Facility Development Act for the performance of the same


such services under the qualified federal contract and is not


qualified for approval of an application for incentive payments


under the Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program Act, the Saving Quality Jobs


Act, the 21st Century Quality Jobs Incentive Act or the Former


Military Facility Development Act for the performance of the same


such services under the qualified federal contract. If the


qualified federal contractor or the subcontractor are is receiving


or have has an approved application for incentive payments under the


Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program Act, the Saving Quality Jobs Act, the


21st Century Quality Jobs Incentive Act or the Former Military


Facility Development Act for the performance of the same such


services under the qualified federal contract, each may choose to


defer in part or in entirety the other incentives for the qualified


federal contractor to receive the incentives pursuant to subsection


B of this section. The federal contract verifier shall confirm any


deferrals and ensure the total for all quality jobs incentive


payments on any individual does not exceed the total net benefit to

Req. No. 3277 Page 50


the state. Should neither the federal contractor nor the


subcontractor defer in part or in entirety their incentive payments


such that the total for all Quality Jobs quality jobs incentive


payments exceeds the total net benefit to the state, the priority


for incentive payments shall go to the entity with the earliest


recognized start date indentified identified within the current


Oklahoma Department of Commerce Quality Jobs quality jobs contract.


SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 3606, as


last amended by Section 2, Chapter 29, 1st Extraordinary Session,


O.S.L. 2023 (68 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 3606), is amended to read


as follows:


Section 3606. A. As soon as practicable Within one (1) year


after the end of the first complete calendar quarter following the


start date, the establishment shall file a claim for the payment


with the Oklahoma Tax Commission and shall specify the actual number


and gross payroll of new direct jobs for the establishment for the


calendar quarter. The Tax Commission shall verify the actual gross


payroll for new direct jobs for the establishment for such calendar


quarter. If the Tax Commission is not able to provide such


verification utilizing all available resources, the Tax Commission


may request such additional information from the establishment as


may be necessary or may request the establishment to revise its


claim. An establishment may file for an extension of the initial


filing date with the Oklahoma Department of Commerce. Any such

Req. No. 3277 Page 51


extension shall be based solely upon an extraordinary adverse


business circumstance which prevented the establishment from hiring


the new direct jobs as projected. If an establishment fails to file


claims as required by this section, it shall forfeit the right to


receive any incentive payments after three (3) years from the start


date. If an establishment has filed at least one claim pursuant to


this section but fails to file another claim within two (2) years of


the most recent claim, the Tax Commission, after consulting with the


Oklahoma Department of Commerce, may dismiss the establishment from


the program, forfeiting the establishment’s right to receive


incentive payments based on that contract.


B. 1. Except as otherwise provided in paragraph 2 of this


subsection, if the actual verified gross payroll for four (4)


consecutive calendar quarters does not equal or exceed the


applicable total required by Section 3604 of this title within three


(3) years of the start date, or does not equal or exceed the


applicable total required by Section 3604 of this title at any other


time during the ten-year period after the start date or during the


thirty-year period after the start date for establishments defined


or classified in the NAICS North American Industry Classification


System (NAICS) Manual under U.S. Industry No. 711211 (2007 version),


the incentive payments shall not be made and shall not be resumed


until such time as the actual verified gross payroll equals or


exceeds the amounts specified in Section 3604 of this title. If an

Req. No. 3277 Page 52


establishment fails to achieve the required gross payroll within


three (3) years of the start date, the establishment shall not make


a new or renewal application for incentive payments authorized


pursuant to the Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program Act for a period of


twelve (12) months from the last day of the last month of the three-


year period during which the required gross payroll amount was not


achieved.


2. Any establishment which does not meet the quarterly payroll


requirements provided pursuant to paragraph 1 of this subsection


during the time period which begins on April 1, 2020, and ends on


June 30, 2021, shall continue to receive incentive payments and


shall be exempt from the prescribed limitations.


C. If the average annualized wage required for an establishment


does not equal or exceed the amount specified in paragraph 1 or 2 of


subsection F of Section 3604 of this title during any calendar


quarter, the incentive payments shall not be made and shall not be


resumed until such time as such requirements are met.


D. In no event shall incentive payments, cumulatively, exceed


the estimated net direct state benefits, except for establishments


subject to the provisions of subparagraph d of paragraph 7 of


subsection A of Section 3603 of this title.


E. An establishment that has qualified pursuant to Section 3604


of this title may receive payments only in accordance with the


provisions of the law under which it initially applied and was

Req. No. 3277 Page 53


approved. If an establishment that is receiving incentive payments


expands, it may apply for additional incentive payments based on the


gross payroll anticipated from the expansion only, pursuant to


Section 3604 of this title. Provided, an establishment which has


suffered an extraordinary adverse business circumstance, as


certified by the Incentive Approval Committee, may be allowed to


voluntarily withdraw from the Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program, repay


to the Tax Commission the total amount of incentive payments


received pursuant to the provisions of this section, plus interest


at the rate specified in Section 727.1 of Title 12 of the Oklahoma


Statutes, and reapply to the Department for a new incentive contract


if the establishment qualifies pursuant to the provisions of the


Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program Act. Any funds received by the Tax


Commission pursuant to the provisions of this subsection shall be


apportioned in the manner that income tax revenues are apportioned.


F. An establishment that is receiving incentive payments may


not apply for additional incentive payments for any new projects


until twelve (12) quarters after receipt of the first incentive


payment, or until the establishment’s actual verified gross payroll


for new direct jobs equals or exceeds Two Million Five Hundred


Thousand Dollars ($2,500,000.00) during any four consecutive-


calendar-quarter period, whichever comes first. After meeting the


requirements of this subsection, an establishment may apply for



Req. No. 3277 Page 54


additional incentive payments based upon the gross payroll


anticipated from an expansion only.


G. As soon as practicable after verification of the actual


gross payroll as required by this section and except as otherwise


provided by subsection K of Section 3604 of this title, the Tax


Commission shall issue a warrant to the establishment in the amount


of the net benefit rate multiplied by the actual gross payroll as


determined pursuant to subsection A of this section for the calendar


quarter.


SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 3903, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 3903. As used in the Small Employer Quality Jobs


Incentive Act:


1. “Basic industry” means a basic industry as defined under the


Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program Act in divisions (1) through (9) of


subparagraph a of paragraph 1 of subsection A of Section 3603 of


this title, excluding those activities described in division (10) of


subparagraph a of paragraph 1 of subsection A of Section 3603 of


this title. Provided, for the purposes of the Small Employer


Quality Jobs Incentive Act, the determination required by


subdivision (b) of division (7) or division (8) of subparagraph a of


paragraph 1 of subsection A of Section 3603 of this title shall be


made by the Oklahoma Department of Commerce and not the Incentive


Approval Committee;

Req. No. 3277 Page 55


2. “Establishment” means any business, no matter what legal


form, including, but not limited to, a sole proprietorship,


partnership, corporation, or limited liability corporation;


3. “Estimated direct state benefits” means the tax revenues


projected by the Oklahoma Department of Commerce to accrue to the


state as a result of new direct jobs;


4. “Estimated direct state costs” means the costs projected by


the Department to accrue to the state as a result of new direct


jobs. Such costs shall include, but not be limited to:


a. the costs of education of new state resident children,


b. the costs of public health, public safety and


transportation services to be provided to new state


residents,


c. the costs of other state services to be provided to


new state residents, and


d. the costs of other state services;


5. “Estimated net direct state benefits” means the estimated


direct state benefits less the estimated direct state costs;


6. “Full-time employment” means employment of persons residing


in this state and working for thirty (30) hours per week or more in


this state, which has a minimum six-month duration during any


twelve-month period;


7. “Gross taxable payroll” means wages, as defined in Section


2385.1 of this title, for new direct jobs;

Req. No. 3277 Page 56


8. “Net benefit rate” means the estimated net direct state


benefits computed as a percentage of gross payroll; provided:


a. the net benefit rate may be variable and shall not


exceed five percent (5%) the highest rate of income


tax imposed upon the Oklahoma taxable income of


individuals pursuant to subsection D of Section 2355


of this title. Any change in the highest rate of


individual income tax imposed pursuant to the


provisions of Section 2355 of this title shall be


applicable to the computation of incentive payments to


an establishment and shall be effective for purposes


of incentive payments based on payroll paid by an


establishment on or after January 1 of any applicable


year for which the net benefit rate is modified as


required by this subparagraph, and


b. in no event shall incentive payments, cumulatively,


exceed the estimated net direct state benefits; and


9. “New direct job” means full-time employment which did not


exist in this state prior to the date of approval, by the Oklahoma


Department of Commerce, of an application made pursuant to the Small


Employer Quality Jobs Incentive Act. A job shall be deemed to exist


in this state prior to approval of an application if the activities


and functions for which the particular job exists have been ongoing


at any time within six (6) months prior to such approval.

Req. No. 3277 Page 57


SECTION 6. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 3905, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 3905. A. 1. Beginning with the first complete


calendar quarter after the application of the establishment is


approved by the Oklahoma Department of Commerce, the establishment


shall begin filing quarterly reports with the Oklahoma Tax


Commission that specify the actual number and individual gross


taxable payroll of new direct jobs for the establishment and such


other information as required by the Tax Commission. In no event


shall the first claim for incentive payments be filed later than


three (3) years one (1) year from the start date designated by the


Department. The Tax Commission shall verify the actual individual


gross taxable payroll for new direct jobs. If the Tax Commission is


not able to provide such verification utilizing all available


resources, the Tax Commission may request additional information


from the establishment as may be necessary or may request the


establishment to revise its reports.


The establishment shall continue filing such reports during the


seven-year incentive period or until it is no longer qualified to


receive incentive payments. Such reports shall constitute a claim


for quarterly incentive payments by the establishment.


2. Upon receipt of a report for the initial calendar quarter of


the incentive period and for each subsequent calendar quarter



Req. No. 3277 Page 58


thereafter, the Tax Commission shall determine if the establishment


has met the following requirements:


a. created and or maintained the minimum number of new


direct jobs as specified in paragraph 3 of subsection


C of Section 3904 of this title, and


b. paid the individuals it employed in new direct jobs an


annualized wage which equaled or exceeded the


applicable percentage of the average county wage as


that percentage was determined by the Oklahoma


Department of Commerce upon approval of the


application.


3. Upon determining that an establishment has met the


requirements of paragraph 2 of this subsection for the initial


calendar quarter of the incentive period, the Tax Commission shall


issue a warrant to the establishment in an amount which shall be


equal to the net benefit rate multiplied by the amount of gross


taxable payroll of new direct jobs actually paid by the


establishment.


B. Except as provided in subsection C of this section, the


quarterly incentive payment provided for in subsection A of this


section shall be allowed in each of the twenty-seven subsequent


calendar quarters.


C. 1. An establishment which does not meet the requirements of


paragraph 2 of subsection A of this section within twelve (12)

Req. No. 3277 Page 59


months of the date of its application, or after July 1, 2011, within


twenty-four (24) months of the date of its application, shall be


ineligible to receive any incentive payments pursuant to its


application and approval.


2. An establishment which at any time during the twenty-seven


subsequent calendar quarters does not meet the requirements of


paragraph 2 of subsection A of this section shall be ineligible to


receive an incentive payment during the calendar quarter in which


such requirements are not met.


SECTION 7. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 3913, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 3913. As used in the 21st Century Quality Jobs


Incentive Act:


1. “Basic industry” means:


a. a basic industry as defined under the Oklahoma Quality


Jobs Program Act in divisions (1) through (9) of


subparagraph a of paragraph 1 of subsection A of


Section 3603 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


excluding those activities described in division (10)


of subparagraph a of paragraph 1 of subsection A of


Section 3603 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


For the purposes of this act, if a determination is


required by subdivision (b) of division (7) or by


division (9) of subparagraph a of paragraph 1 of

Req. No. 3277 Page 60


subsection A of Section 3603 of Title 68 of the


Oklahoma Statutes, such determination shall be:


(1) made by the Oklahoma Department of Commerce and


not by the Incentive Approval Committee, and


(2) based on a requirement that those industries that


are required to have at least seventy-five


percent (75%) of total sales to out-of-state


customers or buyers for purposes of the Quality


Jobs Program Act shall only be required to have


fifty percent (50%) of total sales, as determined


by the Department of Commerce, to out-of-state


customers or buyers, to in-state customers or


buyers if the product or service is resold by the


purchaser to an out-of-state customer or buyer


for ultimate use, or to the federal government,


for the purposes of this act,


b. (1) those specialty hospitals (except psychiatric and


substance abuse hospitals) defined or classified


in the NAICS Manual under U.S. Industry Group No.


62231, and


(2) those performing arts companies defined or


classified in the NAICS Manual under U.S.


Industry Group No.7111, and



Req. No. 3277 Page 61


c. an establishment classified in this subparagraph which


has or will have within one (1) year sales of at least


fifty percent (50%) of its total sales, as determined


by the Department of Commerce, to out-of-state


customers or buyers, to in-state customers or buyers


if the product or service is resold by the purchaser


to an out-of-state customer or buyer for ultimate use,


or to the federal government:


(1) those electric utility activities defined or


classified in the NAICS Manual under U.S.


Industry Group No. 2211 which meet the


requirements of subdivisions a, b and d of


division 2 of subparagraph a of paragraph 1 of


Section 3603 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma


Statutes,


(2) those heavy and civil engineering construction


activities defined or classified in the NAICS


Manual under U.S. Industry Group No. 237,


(3) those motion picture and video industries defined


or classified in the NAICS Manual under U.S.


Industry Group No. 5121,


(4) those sound recording industries defined or


classified in the NAICS Manual under U.S.


Industry Group No. 5122,

Req. No. 3277 Page 62


(5) those securities, commodity contracts and other


financial investment activities defined or


classified in the NAICS Manual under U.S.


Industry Group No. 523,


(6) those insurance carriers and related activities


defined or classified in the NAICS Manual under


U.S. Industry Group No. 524,


(7) those funds, trusts and other financial vehicles


defined or classified in the NAICS Manual under


U.S. Industry Group No. 525,


(8) those professional, scientific and technical


services defined or classified in the NAICS


Manual under U.S. Industry Group Nos. 5411, 5412,


5413, 5414, 5418 and 5419, and


(9) those electronic and precision equipment repair


and maintenance activities defined or classified


in the NAICS Manual under U.S. Industry Group No.


8112;


2. “Establishment” means any business, no matter what legal


form, including, but not limited to, a sole proprietorship,


partnership, corporation, or limited liability corporation;


3. “Estimated direct state benefits” means the tax revenues


projected by the Oklahoma Department of Commerce to accrue to the


state as a result of new direct jobs;

Req. No. 3277 Page 63


4. “Estimated indirect state benefits” means the indirect new


tax revenues projected by the Oklahoma Department of Commerce to


accrue to the state, including, but not limited to, revenue


generated from ancillary support jobs directly related to the


establishment;


5. “Estimated direct state costs” means the costs projected by


the Department to accrue to the state as a result of new direct


jobs. Such costs shall include, but not be limited to:


a. the costs of education of new state resident children,


b. the costs of public health, public safety and


transportation services to be provided to new state


residents,


c. the costs of other state services to be provided to


new state residents, and


d. the costs of other state services;


6. “Estimated indirect state costs” means the costs projected


by the Department to accrue to the state as a result of new indirect


jobs. Such costs shall include, but not be limited to, costs


enumerated in subparagraphs a, b, c and d of paragraph 5 of this


subsection;


7. “Estimated net direct state benefits” means the estimated


direct state benefits less the estimated direct state costs;





Req. No. 3277 Page 64


8. “Estimated net direct and indirect state benefits” means the


estimated direct and indirect state benefits less the estimated


direct and indirect state costs;


9. “Full-time employment” means employment of persons residing


in this state and working for thirty (30) hours per week or more in


this state, which has a minimum six-month duration during any


twelve-month period;


10. “Gross taxable payroll” means wages, as defined in Section


2385.1 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes, for new direct jobs;


11. “Initial net benefit rate” means the estimated net direct


state benefits computed as a percentage of gross payroll; provided:


a. the initial net benefit rate may be variable and shall


not exceed seven percent (7%) the highest rate of


income tax imposed upon the Oklahoma taxable income of


individuals pursuant to subsection D of Section 2355


of this title. Any change in the highest rate of


individual income tax imposed pursuant to the


provisions of Section 2355 of this title shall be


applicable to the computation of incentive payments to


an establishment and shall be effective for purposes


of incentive payments based on payroll paid by an


establishment on or after January 1 of any applicable


year for which the net benefit rate is modified as


required by this subparagraph, and

Req. No. 3277 Page 65


b. in no event shall incentive payments, cumulatively,


exceed the estimated net direct state benefits; and


12. “Fulfillment net benefit rate” means the estimated net


direct and indirect state benefits computed as a percentage of gross


payroll after the completion of the first twelve (12) quarters or


until the establishment reaches ten new direct jobs, whichever


occurs first, provided:


a. the fulfillment net benefit rate may be variable and


shall not exceed ten percent (10%) the highest rate of


income tax imposed upon the Oklahoma taxable income of


individuals pursuant to subsection D of Section 2355


of this title. Any change in the highest rate of


individual income tax imposed pursuant to the


provisions of Section 2355 of this title shall be


applicable to the computation of incentive payments to


an establishment and shall be effective for purposes


of incentive payments based on payroll paid by an


establishment on or after January 1 of any applicable


year for which the previous net benefit rate is


modified as required by this subparagraph, and


b. in no event shall incentive payments, cumulatively,


exceed the estimated net direct and indirect state


benefits; and



Req. No. 3277 Page 66


13. “New direct job” means full-time employment which did not


exist in this state prior to the date of approval, by the Oklahoma


Department of Commerce, of an application made pursuant to this act.


A job shall be deemed to exist in this state prior to approval of an


application if the activities and functions for which the particular


job exists have been ongoing at anytime within six (6) months prior


to such approval.


SECTION 8. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 3914, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 3914. A. Except for the payment amount required by


subsection E of this section, an establishment which meets the


qualifications specified in the 21st Century Quality Jobs Incentive


Act may receive quarterly incentive payments for a ten-year period


from the Oklahoma Tax Commission pursuant to the provisions of this


act the 21st Century Quality Jobs Incentive Act, as verified by the


Tax Commission, in an amount equal to:


1. The gross payroll multiplied by the initial net benefit rate


until such time as the establishment creates ten new direct jobs; or


2. The gross payroll multiplied by the fulfillment net benefit


rate after such time as the establishment created and maintains ten


new direct jobs.


B. In order to receive incentive payments, an establishment


shall apply to the Oklahoma Department of Commerce. The application


shall be on a form prescribed by the Department and shall contain

Req. No. 3277 Page 67


such information as may be required by the Department to determine


if the applicant is qualified. The establishment may apply for an


effective date for a project, which shall not be more than twelve


(12) months from the date the application is submitted to the


Department.


C. Before approving an application for incentive payments, the


Department must first determine that the applicant meets the


following requirements:


1. Be engaged in a basic industry as defined in the 21st


Century Quality Jobs Incentive Act;


2. Will hire at least ten full-time employees in this state


within twelve (12) quarters of the date of application;


3. Will pay the individuals it employs in new direct jobs an


average annualized wage which equals or exceeds three hundred


percent (300%) of the average county wage for the county in which


the applicant is located as that percentage is determined by the


Oklahoma Department of Commerce based on the most recent U.S. United


States Department of Commerce data. For purposes of this paragraph,


health care premiums paid by the applicant for individuals in new


direct jobs shall not be included in the annualized wage. Provided,


for applications submitted before January 1, 2027, no average wage


requirement shall exceed Ninety-four Thousand Dollars ($94,000.00)


in any county. This maximum wage threshold shall be indexed and


modified from time to time based on the latest Consumer Price Index

Req. No. 3277 Page 68


year-to-date percent change release as of the date of the annual


average county wage data release from the Bureau of Economic


Analysis of the U.S. United States Department of Commerce;


4. Has a basic health benefit plan which, as determined by the


Department, meets the elements established under divisions (1)


through (7) of subparagraph b of paragraph 1 of subsection A of


Section 3603 of this title and which will be offered to individuals


within twelve (12) months of employment in a new direct job;


5. Has not received incentive payments under the Small Employer


Quality Jobs Program Incentive Act, the Saving Quality Jobs Act or


the Former Military Facility Development Act; and


6. Is not qualified for approval of an application for


incentive payments under the Small Employer Quality Jobs Program


Incentive Act, the Saving Quality Jobs Act or the Former Military


Facility Development Act.


D. The Oklahoma Department of Commerce shall determine if an


applicant is qualified to receive the incentive payment. Upon


qualifying the applicant, the Department shall notify the Tax


Commission and shall provide it with a copy of the contract and


approval which shall provide the number of persons employed by the


applicant upon the date of approval and the maximum total incentives


which may be paid to the applicant during the ten-year period. The


Tax Commission may require the qualified establishment to submit


additional information as may be necessary to administer the

Req. No. 3277 Page 69


provisions of this act the 21st Century Quality Jobs Incentive Act.


The approved establishment shall report to the Tax Commission


quarterly to show its continued eligibility for incentive payments,


as provided in Section 3905 of this title. Establishments may be


audited by the Tax Commission to verify such eligibility. Once the


establishment is approved, an agreement shall be deemed to exist


between the establishment and the State of Oklahoma, requiring


incentive payments to be made for a ten-year period as long as the


establishment retains its eligibility and within the limitations of


this act the 21st Century Quality Jobs Incentive Act as it existed


at the time of such approval.


E. For any contract executed by an establishment on or after


the effective date of this act August 2, 2018, five percent (5%) of


the quarterly incentive payment amount shall be transferred by the


Oklahoma Tax Commission to the Oklahoma Quick Action Closing Fund.


SECTION 9. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 3915, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 3915. A. 1. Beginning with the first complete


calendar quarter after the application of the establishment is


approved by the Oklahoma Department of Commerce, the establishment


shall begin filing quarterly reports with the Oklahoma Tax


Commission that specify the actual number and individual gross


taxable payroll of new direct jobs for the establishment and such


other information as required by the Tax Commission. In no event

Req. No. 3277 Page 70


shall the first claim for incentive payments be filed later than


three (3) years one (1) year from the start date designated by the


Department. The Tax Commission shall verify the actual individual


gross taxable payroll for new direct jobs. If the Tax Commission is


not able to provide such verification utilizing all available


resources, the Tax Commission may request additional information


from the establishment as may be necessary or may request the


establishment to revise its reports.


The establishment shall continue filing such reports during the


ten-year incentive period or until it is no longer qualified to


receive incentive payments. Such reports shall constitute a claim


for quarterly incentive payments by the establishment.


2. Upon receipt of a report for the initial calendar quarter of


the incentive period and for each subsequent calendar quarter


thereafter, the Tax Commission shall determine if the establishment


has met the following requirements:


a. during the initial twelve (12) quarters of the


contract or until the establishment creates ten new


direct jobs, paid the individuals it employed in new


direct jobs an average annualized wage that exceeded


the requirements of paragraph 3 of subsection C of


Section 3914 of this title, or


b. after the establishment created ten new direct jobs:



Req. No. 3277 Page 71


(1) paid the individuals it employed in new direct


jobs an average annualized wage which equaled or


exceeded the requirements of paragraph 3 of


subsection C of Section 3914 of this title, and


(2) created and/or or maintained the minimum number


of new direct jobs as specified in the 21st


Century Quality Jobs Incentive Act.


3. Upon determining that an establishment has met the


requirements of paragraph 2 of this subsection for the initial


calendar quarter of the incentive period, the Tax Commission shall


issue a warrant to the establishment in an amount which shall be


equal to either:


a. the initial net benefit rate multiplied by the amount


of gross taxable payroll of new direct jobs actually


paid by the establishment during the initial twelve


(12) quarters of the contract or until the


establishment reaches ten new direct jobs, whichever


comes first, or


b. the fulfillment net benefit rate multiplied by the


amount of gross taxable payroll of new direct jobs


actually paid by the establishment after it creates or


maintains ten new direct jobs.


B. Except as provided in subsection C of this section, the


quarterly incentive payment provided for in subsection A of this

Req. No. 3277 Page 72


section shall be allowed in each of the thirty-nine (39) subsequent


calendar quarters.


C. 1. An establishment which does not meet the requirements of


paragraph 2 of subsection A of this section within twelve (12)


quarters of the date of its application shall be ineligible to


receive any incentive payments pursuant to its application and


approval.


2. An establishment which at any time during the thirty-nine


(39) subsequent calendar quarters does not meet the requirements of


paragraph 2 of subsection A of this section shall be ineligible to


receive an incentive payment during the calendar quarter in which


such requirements are not met.


3. An establishment which has met the requirements of paragraph


of subsection A of this section within twelve (12) quarters of the


date of its application, but which at any time during the subsequent


twenty-eight (28) quarters fails to meet the requirements of


paragraph 2 of subsection A of this section in four (4) consecutive


quarters, shall be ineligible to receive any further incentive


payments pursuant to its application and approval.


SECTION 10. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 4503, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 127, O.S.L. 2025 (68 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 4503), is amended to read as follows:


Section 4503. A. As used in the Oklahoma Remote Quality Jobs


Incentive Act:

Req. No. 3277 Page 73


1. “Basic industry” means an establishment that attracts remote


workers to the state whose purpose is to increase the state’s


population and who may receive rebates on the remote workers;


provided, that the remote workers meet the wage and health insurance


requirements in the state and provide evidence of such to the proxy


establishment;


2. “New direct job” shall include full-time-equivalent


employment in this state of remote workers who are employed by an


establishment other than the proxy establishment which has qualified


to receive incentive payments for attracting remote workers to the


state. Such jobs held by remote workers did not exist in this state


prior to the date of approval by the Oklahoma Department of Commerce


of the application of the proxy establishment. A job shall be


deemed to exist in this state prior to approval of an application if


the activities and functions for which the particular job exists


have been ongoing at any time within six (6) months prior to such


approval;


3. “Proxy establishment” means:


a. a public trust which:


(1) is organized and existing under Section 176 of


Title 60 of the Oklahoma Statutes for the benefit


of a geographic area which includes a city or


county or some combination thereof, and



Req. No. 3277 Page 74


(2) benefits a geographic area where new direct jobs


which meet the requirements of the Oklahoma


Remote Quality Jobs Incentive Act are created by


an establishment, other than the proxy


establishment, or


b. an establishment which facilitates the attraction of


remote workers to the State of Oklahoma;


4. “Remote worker” refers to a work flexibility arrangement


under which an employee performs the duties and responsibilities of


such employee’s position, and other authorized activities, from an


approved work site other than the location from which the employee


would otherwise work, which shall not be located within the physical


boundaries of the State of Oklahoma. The remote worker should not


have lived in the State of Oklahoma in the previous twelve (12)


months;


5. “Estimated direct state benefits” means the tax revenues


projected by the Department to accrue to the state as a result of


new direct jobs;


6. “Estimated direct state costs” means the costs projected by


the Department to accrue to the state as a result of new direct


jobs. Such costs shall include, but not be limited to:


a. the costs of education of new state resident children,





Req. No. 3277 Page 75


b. the costs of public health, public safety and


transportation services to be provided to new state


residents,


c. the costs of other state services to be provided to


new state residents, and


d. the costs of other state services;


7. “Estimated net direct state benefits” means the estimated


direct state benefits less the estimated direct state costs; and


8. “Net benefit rate” means the estimated net direct state


benefits computed as a percentage of gross payroll, and shall not


exceed five percent (5%) the highest rate of income tax imposed upon


the Oklahoma taxable income of individuals pursuant to subsection D


of Section 2355 of this title. Any change in the highest rate of


individual income tax imposed pursuant to the provisions of Section


2355 of this title shall be applicable to the computation of


incentive payments to an establishment and shall be effective for


purposes of incentive payments based on payroll paid by an


establishment on or after January 1 of any applicable year for which


the net benefit rate is modified as required by this paragraph.


B. A proxy establishment shall be required to obtain from


remote workers proof of basic health benefits plans for the


individuals it includes in an application. The proxy establishment


shall submit the information to the Oklahoma Department of Commerce


and shall ensure that the basic health benefits plans provide

Req. No. 3277 Page 76


coverage where not more than fifty percent (50%) of the premium


shall be paid by the employee; however, services provided by an


Employee Assistance Plan (EAP) are not sufficient to meet this


definition.


SECTION 11. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3277 QD 1/12/2026 10:26:54 PM



































Req. No. 3277 Page 77